Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-143
Vehicle with modification or deviation from original specifications; how treated.

An owner of a vehicle with a modification or deviation from the original specifications may be permitted to apply for a certificate of title under sections 60-142.01 to 60-142.03 if such modification or deviation is of historic nature and essentially the same in design and material to that originally supplied by the manufacturer for vehicles of that era or if the modification or deviation could be considered to be in the category of safety features. Safety-related modifications include hydraulic brakes, sealed-beam headlights, and occupant protection systems as defined in section 60-6,265. A modification or deviation involving accessories shall be limited to those accessories available in the era to which the vehicle belongs.

Laws 2005, LB 276, § 43;

Laws 2006, LB 663, § 12.